Maine, session 132, LD716.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 12 MRSA §10902, sub-§7, as affected by PL 2003, c. 614, §9, amended by
c. 655, Pt. B, §100 and affected by §422, is further amended to read:
7. Mandatory hunting license revocation; coyote hunting violation. A hunting
license of a person convicted of hunting coyote in violation of section 11160 or 12001 must
be revoked and that person is ineligible to obtain any hunting license for a period of one
year from the date of conviction and a $500 fine must be imposed.
Sec. 2. 12 MRSA §11160, sub-§1, as enacted by PL 2003, c. 414, Pt. A, §2 and
affected by c. 614, §9, is amended to read:
1. Permit required. Except as otherwise authorized pursuant to this Part, a person
may not hunt coyote at night unless that person has a valid permit issued under this section.
Each night a person violates this subsection that person commits a Class E crime for which
a minimum fine of $50 and an amount equal to twice the applicable license fee $500 must
be imposed and the hunting license of that person must be revoked for a period of one year.
Sec. 3. 12 MRSA §12001, as amended by PL 2011, c. 216, §1, is further amended
by amending the section headnote to read:
§12001. Night season Season and restrictions
Sec. 4. 12 MRSA §12001, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2011, c. 216, §1, is further
amended to read:
1. Coyote hunting. Notwithstanding the night hunting prohibitions in section 11206,
there is an open season for hunting coyotes at night in all counties of the State from
December 16th to August 31st October 1st to March 31st.
Notwithstanding section 11214, subsection 1, paragraph M, the commissioner may appoint
agents to hunt for coyotes at night using artificial illumination from September 1st to
December 15th. The commissioner shall develop policies to make the affected public and
affected law enforcement officers aware of any night hunting operations.